Arkansas, session 2025, SB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-93-104(a), concerning the contents of a
notification of adverse action under the Credit Reporting Disclosure Act of
1989, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The notification of adverse action shall be in writing and shall
contain:
(1) A statement of the action taken;
(2) The name and address of the creditor; and
(3) The name and address of the consumer reporting agency making
the report; and
(4) The Social Security number of the consumer, provided that
the Social Security number has been given to the user of the consumer report
by the consumer or is contained in the consumer report received from the
consumer reporting agency.



*ANS006*
02/17/2025 11:28:53 AM ANS006